District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.41

Emergency applicant may retain automobile.

An applicant for public assistance who requests assistance by reason of an emergency for not more than 60 days shall be entitled to retain whatever automobile is then owned or being paid for by him or her.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 541, 29 DCR 1060

History

1981 Ed., § 3-205.41.

Prior Codifications